New York, session 2025-2026, A6286.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 3039 2 to read as follows: 3 § 3039. Residency of teachers employed by the Buffalo school district. 4 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, residency within the city 5 limits of Buffalo shall be a prerequisite for appointment to any teach- 6 ing position in the Buffalo school district. 7 2. The Buffalo school district shall require all applicants for a 8 teaching position to provide one form of proof of residency. Such form, 9 to be determined by the school district, may include, but is not limited 10 to, a driver's license, a department of motor vehicles non-driver iden- 11 tification card or other current and valid photo identification, a 12 current utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck or 13 other government document that shows the name and address of the appli- 14 cant. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01789-01-5